Maine, session 132, LD778.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 914-E is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 914-E
2025 MAINE TAX AMNESTY PROGRAM
§6621. 2025 Maine Tax Amnesty Program established
There is established the 2025 Maine Tax Amnesty Program, referred to in this chapter
as "the tax amnesty program." The tax amnesty program is intended to encourage
delinquent taxpayers to comply with the State's tax laws and to enable the assessor to
identify and collect previously unreported taxes and to accelerate collection of certain
delinquent tax liabilities. The long-term goal of the tax amnesty program is to improve
taxpayer compliance with the State's tax laws.
§6622. Administration; program qualifications; taxpayer immune from prosecution
and penalties
The assessor shall administer the tax amnesty program. The following provisions
govern eligibility for the tax amnesty program.
1. Qualifying tax liabilities. The tax amnesty program applies to tax liabilities
delinquent as of September 30, 2025, including tax due for which a return has not been
filed. A taxpayer may participate in the tax amnesty program to the extent of the
uncontested portion of an assessed liability.
2. Taxpayer participation while under audit or subject to administrative or
judicial proceeding. A taxpayer may participate in the tax amnesty program whether or
not the taxpayer is under audit and without regard to whether the amount due is subject to
a pending administrative or judicial proceeding, except that the following circumstances
disqualify a taxpayer from participation.
A. The taxpayer is currently charged with, and has been accepted by the Attorney
General for criminal prosecution arising from, a violation of the state tax laws as
provided in this Title or Title 17-A, or is applying for relief on a debt that is the result
of a criminal conviction.
B. The taxpayer is applying for relief with respect to a tax liability for which the State
has secured a warrant or civil judgment in its favor in Superior Court.
3. Taxpayer waives right to protest return or seek refund under tax amnesty
program. Participation in the tax amnesty program is conditioned upon the taxpayer's
agreement to forgo the right to protest or pursue an administrative or judicial proceeding
with regard to returns filed under the tax amnesty program or to claim any refund of money
paid under the tax amnesty program.
4. Immunity from prosecution and penalties; reduction of interest. Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a taxpayer with a tax liability within the limitations of
this chapter and who meets the eligibility requirements of this section is immune from
criminal or civil prosecution or civil penalties with respect to that tax liability and is
required to pay only 1/2 of the interest associated with that tax liability if:
Page 1 - 132LR2228(01)

A. The taxpayer properly completes and files a 2025 amnesty tax return as described
in section 6625 in the manner required by the assessor;
B. The assessor approves the return; and
C. The taxpayer pays all tax and interest as determined on the return before the end of
the amnesty period described in section 6624.
§6623. Undisclosed liabilities
This chapter may not be construed to prohibit the assessor from instituting civil or
criminal proceedings against any taxpayer with respect to any amount of tax that is not
disclosed either on the 2025 amnesty tax return described in section 6625 or on any other
return filed with the assessor.
§6624. Amnesty period
The time period during which a 2025 amnesty tax return described in section 6625 may
be filed is October 1, 2025 to December 31, 2025.
§6625. 2025 amnesty tax return
The assessor shall prepare and make available a 2025 amnesty tax return that taxpayers
must complete and file to participate in the tax amnesty program. The return and associated
guidelines prepared by the assessor that govern participation in the tax amnesty program
are exempt from the Maine Administrative Procedure Act. A filed return requires the
approval of the assessor. The assessor may deny any return not consistent with the tax
amnesty program.
§6626. Preamnesty settlements
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the assessor shall, during
the period beginning on the effective date of this chapter to September 30, 2025, make a
settlement offer that requires full payment of tax and 1/2 of the accrued interest to any
taxpayer that has a recorded and recognized delinquent state tax liability as of the effective
date of this chapter. The assessor may, through a settlement offer made pursuant to this
section, abate the amount of any penalties owed by the taxpayer associated with the tax
liability addressed in the settlement offer.
A taxpayer is not eligible for a settlement offer authorized under this section if the
taxpayer's liability is the result of a criminal conviction or the taxpayer is currently charged
with a criminal offense arising from a violation of the state tax laws as provided in this
Title or Title 17-A or has been referred to the Attorney General for criminal prosecution.
Sec. 2. Preamnesty collections; legislative intent. The Legislature finds that it
is in the best interest of the State and public welfare of the people of the State to ensure that
there is no delay in the payment of delinquent state tax liabilities as a result of the 2025
Maine Tax Amnesty Program established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, chapter
914-E. The Legislature further finds it foreseeable that many taxpayers may choose to
defer payment of delinquent tax liabilities in order to take advantage of lower interest and
penalty amounts available under the 2025 Maine Tax Amnesty Program. Therefore, to
ensure the timely collection of state tax revenue prior to the effective date of the 2025
Maine Tax Amnesty Program, the Legislature encourages the State Tax Assessor to use the
full extent of the State Tax Assessor's authority under Title 36, including the abatement of
Page 2 - 132LR2228(01)

413 interest and penalty amounts consistent with the provisions of the 2025 Maine Tax
424 Amnesty Program.